District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Revenue Stabilization and Land Value Assessment Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Subchapter II of Chapter 8 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-811 is amended by adding a new subsection (b-1) to read as follows:
“(b-1)(1) For the tax year beginning July 1, 2028, and each tax year thereafter,
real property taxes shall be due and payable quarterly in four equal installments, except as
otherwise provided in a payment plan entered into pursuant to § 47-811.05.”.
(b) Section 47-820(a)(3) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing test is designated sub-paragraph (A).
(2) A new sub-paragraph (B) is added to read as follows:
“(B) For assessments and revaluations in the tax year beginning July 1,


2028, and each tax year thereafter, the land component of an assessment shall reflect the
estimated market value of the land as if vacant and available for its highest and best use and shall
not vary between similarly situated and zoned parcels based on the presence, absence, or value of
improvements thereon.”.
(c) Section 477-823(c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) The Mayor shall undertake, publish, and otherwise publicize the results of
assessment-sales ratio studies for different types of real property for the entire District and for
different types of real property within each of the districts utilized in making assessments. Such
ratio studies shall include a separate land value component tested against the same accuracy
standards as the total assessment. If, for a given year, adequate sales data are lacking for
particular studies, the Mayor shall so indicate.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.